South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3805.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 1, Title 29 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 29-1-70. (A)(1) A mortgagee in this State is entitled to a grace period of at least twenty days following the due date of the loan payment. The terms of a note securing a mortgage issued in this State shall provide the specific grace period allowed, regardless of whether the twenty-day period required by this section is the only grace period allowed or if more than this minimum twenty-day period is allowed. (2) For the purposes of this section, "grace period" means the period of time during which payment on a mortgage loan may be made after its due date without incurring a late penalty. (B) The provisions of this section apply only to a mortgage on which interest is calculated monthly and do not apply to a simple interest mortgage or other mortgage in which interest accrues daily. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----